Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-513
Airport authority; applicability of sections.

Insofar as the provisions of section 3-239 and the Cities Airport Authorities Act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other act or of any city charter, if any, the provisions of section 3-239 and the Cities Airport Authorities Act shall be controlling.

Laws 1957, c. 9, § 14, p. 126;

Laws 2002, LB 446, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 5, § 4.

This section is to be read as a type of supremacy clause, nullifying any inconsistent statutory or municipal charter provisions. Professional Firefighters of Omaha v. City of Omaha, 243 Neb. 166, 498 N.W.2d 325 (1993).